da: Påføring af smøremiddel: Anal; Massage; Oral; Vaginal; Andet
th: การใช้น้ำมันหล่อลื่น: รูทวาร; การนวด; ช่องปาก; ช่องคลอด; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Uporaba lubrikanta: Analno; Masaža; Oralno; Vaginalno; Drugo
fr: Application de lubrifiant: Anal; Massage; Oral; Vaginal; Autre
es: Aplicación del lubricante: Anal; Masaje; Oral; Vaginal; Otros
sk-SK: Použitie lubrikantu: Análny; Masážny; Ústny; Vaginálny; Iné
sv: Applicering av glidmedel: Anal; Massage; Oral; Vaginal; Övrigt
fi: Voiteluaineen leivitys: Anaali; Hieronta; Oraalinen; Emätin; Muu
ru: Нанесение смазки: Анальный; Для массажа; Оральный; Вагинальный; Другой
ro-RO: Aplicarea lubrifiantului: Anal; Masaj; Oral; Vaginal; Altele
nb: Påføring av smøremiddel: Anal; Massasje; Oral; Vaginal; Annet
tr: Kayganlaştırıcı uygulaması: Anal; Masaj; Oral; Vajinal; Diğer
de: Schmiermittelaufbringung: Anal; Massage; Oral; Vaginal; Sonstiges
cs: Aplikace lubrikantu: Anální; Masážní; Ústní; Vaginální; Jiné
pt-PT: Aplicação do lubrificante: Anal; Massagem; Oral; Vaginal; Outro
zh-TW: 潤滑劑應用: 肛門; 按摩; 口腔; 陰道; 其他
ja: 潤滑剤の用途: アナル; マッサージ; 口腔; 膣; その他
ko: 윤활유 도포: 애널; 마사지; 구강; 질; 기타
pl: Aplikacja środka nawilżającego: Analny; Masaż; Ustnie; Dopochwowy; Inne
pt-BR: Aplicação do lubrificante: Anal; Massagem; Oral; Vaginal; Outro
vi: Ứng dụng bôi trơn: Hậu môn; Mát xa; Thuốc uống; Âm đạo; Khác
lt-LT: Lubrikanto paskirtis: Analinis; Masažinis; Oralinis; Makšties; Kita
hu: Sikosító alkalmazási területe: Anális; Masszázs; Orális; Vaginális; Egyéb
nl: Toepassing smeermiddel: Anaal; Massage; Mondeling; Vaginaal; Andere
bg-BG: Приложение на лубрикант: Анален; Масаж; Орален; Вагинален; Други
en: Lubricant application: Anal; Massage; Oral; Vaginal; Other
hr-HR: Primjena lubrikanta: Analno; Masaža; Oralno; Vaginalno; Ostalo
el: Εφαρμογή λιπαντικού: Πρωκτική χρήση; Μασάζ; Στοματική χρήση; Κολπική χρήση; Άλλο
it: Applicazione del lubrificante: Anale; Massaggio; Orale; Vaginale; Altro
zh-CN: 润滑剂应用: 肛门; 按摩; 口服; 阴道; 其他